Utah statutes.
72-8-106.   Rules and regulations -- Cooperation with the county legislative body.

The department shall:

(1)  make rules providing for uniform accounting of the funds permitted to be expended for curbs, gutters, sidewalks, and pedestrian safety devices, as provided in this part; and

(2)  cooperate with the county executives and county legislative bodies and the governing officials of participating municipalities in order to implement this part and make rules required by this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

